Wyoming statutes. Title 13 Banks, Banking and Finance
Article 7. Completion of Liquidation

§ 13-4-701.
Payment of stockholders.

If the state banking commissioner has paid the full amount of the claim to each depositor and creditor of the bank whose claims have been allowed, has made provision for unpaid deposits and has paid all the expenses of the liquidation, he shall call a meeting of the stockholders of the bank by giving notice for thirty (30) days in a newspaper published in the county in which the bank was located.

At the meeting the stockholders shall determine whether the state banking commissioner shall continue to administer its assets and wind up the affairs of the bank or whether an agent shall be elected for that purpose. The stockholders shall vote by ballot, each share having one (1) vote. An affirmative vote by the majority of the stock is necessary for a determination.

If it is determined to continue the liquidation under the state banking commissioner, he shall complete the liquidation of the affairs of the bank. After paying the expenses of the liquidation, he shall distribute the proceeds among the stockholders in proportion to the holdings of stock as directed by the district court.

If it is determined to appoint an agent to liquidate, the stockholders shall select the agent by ballot. A majority of the stock present and voting is necessary for a choice. The agent shall file with the state banking commissioner a bond approved by the state banking commissioner to the state of Wyoming for the faithful performance of all the duties of his trust. The state banking commissioner shall then transfer assets of the bank to the agent. The state banking commissioner is discharged from all further liability to the bank and its creditors.

The agent shall perform his duties as would the state banking commissioner except that the expenses of liquidation are subject to the control of the district court.

In case of failure to act by any agent the stockholders may elect a successor.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 157, §§ 100 to 104; R.S. 1931, §§ 10-521 to 10-525; C.S. 1945, §§ 35-532 to 35-536; W.S. 1957, §§ 13-159 to 13-163; W.S. 1977, §

13-4-702

; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1.

§ 13-4-702.
Assets discovered after liquidation.

If assets are discovered after the liquidation proceeding has closed and in the opinion of the state banking commissioner the cost of distributing the assets would prevent the payment of a dividend exceeding one-half of one percent (0.5%), the assets shall be converted into money and paid to the commissioner.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 37, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 35-538; W.S. 1957, § 13-165; W.S. 1977, §

13-4-703

; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 2001, ch. 156, § 2.

§ 13-4-703.
Unclaimed dividends and deposits.

Dividends and deposits remaining in the hands of the state banking commissioner six (6) months after the order for final distribution shall be deposited with the state treasurer who shall hold the dividends in a separate account. The state banking commissioner may order the money to be paid to the persons entitled thereto upon satisfactory evidence of their right. In case of doubt he may apply to the court for an order directing the payment. He may apply any interest earned by the money toward defraying the expenses of distribution of the unclaimed deposits or dividends to the depositors and creditors entitled to receive it.

Dividends remaining in the hands of any receiver other than the state banking commissioner or in any account established pursuant to this subsection and unclaimed for five (5) years after the order for final distribution shall escheat to the state as provided by law.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 157, § 105; R.S. 1931, § 10-526; Laws 1939, ch. 37, § 2; C.S. 1945, §§ 35-537, 35-539; W.S. 1957, §§ 13-164, 13-166; Laws 1973, ch. 215, § 1; ch. 245, § 3; 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a), substituted “a separate account” for “an account within the trust and agency fund” at the end of the first sentence; and in (b), substituted “any account established pursuant to this subsection” for “the trust and agency fund.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”